Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.295

Venue and process.

Every action for the involuntary dissolution of a corporation shall be commenced by the attorney general either in the superior court of the county in which the registered office of the corporation is situated, or in the superior court of Thurston county. Summons shall issue and be served as in other civil actions. If process is returned not found, the attorney general shall cause publication to be made as in other civil cases in a newspaper published in the county where the registered office of the corporation is situated, notifying the corporation of the pendency of such action, the title of the court, the title of the action, the date on or after which default may be entered, giving the corporation thirty days within which to appear, answer, and defend. The attorney general may include in one notice the names of any number of corporations against which actions are then pending in the same court. The attorney general shall cause a copy of such notice to be mailed by certified mail to the corporation at its registered office within ten days after the first publication thereof. The certificate of the attorney general of the mailing of such notice shall be prima facie evidence thereof. Such notice shall be published at least once each week for two successive weeks, and the first publication thereof may begin at any time after the summons has been returned not found. Unless a corporation shall have been personally served with summons, no default shall be taken against it less than thirty days from the first publication of such notice.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 59.]